src/morphology/clitics.lexc
LEXICON Clit-Qst
+вэ+Qst:% %{В%}э # ;         ! wh-question
+уу+Qst:% %{У%}%{У%} # ;     ! yes/no-question

LEXICON Clit-NonQst

+даа+Qst:% д%{А1%}%{А2%} # ;   !
+аа+Qst:% %{А1%}%{А2%} # ;     !
+билээ+Qst:% билээ # ;       ! assumed previously known information (?)


LEXICON Clit
! Sentence-final clitics
# ;
!Clit-Qst ;
!Clit-NonQst ;
